test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xadasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюни’, хадасетыхыюни’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюди’, хадасетыхыюди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюди’, хадасетыхыюди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюна”, хадасетыхыюна”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюда”, хадасетыхыюда”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [хадасятыхыюдо’, хадасетыхыюдо’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [хадасятын, хадасетын]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [хадасятыд, хадасетыд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [хадасятыда, хадасетыда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [хадасятыни’, хадасетыни’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [хадасятыди’, хадасетыди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [хадасятыди’, хадасетыди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [хадасятына”, хадасетына”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [хадасятыда”, хадасетыда”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [хадасятыдо’, хадасетыдо’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [хадасятвэв, хадасетвэв]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [хадасятвэр, хадасетвэр]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [хадасятвэда, хадасетвэда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [хадасятвэми’, хадасетвэми’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [хадасятвэри’, хадасетвэри’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [хадасятвэди’, хадасетвэди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [хадасятвэва”, хадасетвэва”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [хадасятвэра”, хадасетвэра”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [хадасятвэдо’, хадасетвэдо’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюн, хадасетвэхэюн]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюд, хадасетвэхэюд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюда, хадасетвэхэюда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюни’, хадасетвэхэюни’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюди’, хадасетвэхэюди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюди’, хадасетвэхэюди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюна”, хадасетвэхэюна”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюда”, хадасетвэхэюда”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [хадасятвэхэюдо’, хадасетвэхэюдо’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [хадасятвын, хадасетвын]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [хадасятвыд, хадасетвыд]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [хадасятвыда, хадасетвыда]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [хадасятвыни’, хадасетвыни’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [хадасятвыди’, хадасетвыди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [хадасятвыди’, хадасетвыди’]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [хадасятвына”, хадасетвына”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [хадасятвыда”, хадасетвыда”]
     хадась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [хадасятвыдо’, хадасетвыдо’]
